Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB282.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 387.500 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent and purpose of the General Assembly to recognize that disabled
persons have varying degrees of disability.
(2) Persons who are only partially disabled must be legally protected without a
determination of total incompetency and without the attendant deprivation of civil
and legal rights that such a determination requires.
(3) To this end, guardianship and conservatorship for disabled persons shall be utilized
only as is necessary to promote their well-being, including protection from neglect,
exploitation, and abuse; shall be designed to encourage the development of
maximum self-reliance and independence in each person; and shall be ordered only
to the extent necessitated by each person's actual mental and adaptive limitations.
(4) If the court determines that some form of guardianship or conservatorship is
necessary, partial guardianship or partial conservatorship shall be the preferred
form of protection and assistance for a disabled person.
(5) District Courts of the Commonwealth shall preserve the due process rights of all
persons alleged to be incapacitated by conducting all disability proceedings in
conformity with statutory procedures.
Section 2. KRS 387.510 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 387.500 to 387.770 and 387.990:
(1) "Conservator" means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the court
to manage the financial resources of a disabled person;
(2) "Limited conservator" means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the
court to assist in managing the financial resources of a partially disabled person and
whose powers and duties have been specifically enumerated by court order;
(3) "Guardian" means any individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the court to
Page 1 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
manage the personal affairs of a disabled person;
(4) "Limited guardian" means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the
court to assist in managing the personal affairs of a partially disabled person and
whose powers and duties have been specifically enumerated by court order;
(5) "Standby" guardian or conservator means a person or entity designated by the court
to assume the powers and duties assigned to a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator upon his or her death, resignation, removal, or
incapacity;
(6) "Testamentary" guardian or conservator means an individual, agency, or
corporation nominated in the will of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator to succeed the testator in that capacity upon his or her
death;
(7) "Developmental disability" means a severe, chronic disability of a person which:
(a) Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental
and physical impairments, including pervasive developmental disorder;
(b) Is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two (22);
(c) Is likely to continue indefinitely;
(d) Results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more of the
following areas of major life activity:
1. Self-care;
2. Receptive and expressive language;
3. Learning;
4. Mobility;
5. Self-direction;
6. Capacity for independent living; and
7. Economic self-sufficiency; and
(e) Reflects the person's need for a combination and sequence of special
Page 2 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
interdisciplinary or generic care, treatment, or other services which are of
lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated;
(8) "Disabled" means a legal disability, not a medical disability, and is measured by
functional inabilities. It refers to any person seventeen (17) years of age or older
who is:
(a) Unable to make informed decisions with respect to his or her personal affairs
to such an extent that he or she lacks the capacity to provide for his or her
physical health and safety, including but not limited to health care, food,
shelter, clothing, or personal hygiene; or
(b) Unable to make informed decisions with respect to his or her financial
resources to such an extent that he or she lacks the capacity to manage his or
her property effectively by those actions necessary to obtain, administer, and
dispose of both real and personal property.
Such inability shall be evidenced by acts or occurrences within six (6) months prior
to the filing of the petition for guardianship or conservatorship and shall not be
evidenced solely by isolated instances of negligence, improvidence, or other
behavior;
(9) "Partially disabled" refers to an individual who lacks the capacity to manage some
of his or her personal affairs [and/]or financial resources as provided in subsection
(8) of this section, but who cannot be found to be fully disabled as provided therein;
(10) "Mentally ill person" means a person with substantially impaired capacity to use
self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of his or her affairs and social
relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized emotional symptoms
where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or emotional symptoms can be
related to physiological, psychological, or social factors;
(11) "Interdisciplinary evaluation report" means a report of an evaluation of a respondent
performed pursuant to the provisions of KRS 387.540 to determine whether he or
Page 3 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
she is partially disabled or disabled as defined in this section[herein];
(12) "Interested person or entity" means an adult relative or friend of the respondent or
protected person[ward], an official or representative of a public or private agency,
corporation, or association concerned with that person's welfare, or any other
person found suitable by the court;
(13) "Petitioner" means a person who institutes a proceeding under KRS 387.530;
(14) "Respondent" means an individual alleged to be a partially disabled or disabled
person;
(15) "Protected person"["Ward"] means a person for whom a limited guardian,
guardian, limited conservator, or conservator has been appointed;
(16) "Committee" means a person appointed by the court prior to July 1, 1982, to have
full care, custody, and control of a disabled person and his or her estate; [and]
(17) "Personal affairs" means decisions regarding the person of an adult, including but
not limited to health care, food, shelter, clothing, or personal hygiene;
(18) "Respondent's attorney" means either private or appointed counsel representing
the respondent, who is:
(a) Not a guardian ad litem; and
(b) Bound by the ethical requirements of all attorneys in Kentucky, including
the duties of loyalty and competent, zealous representation; and
(19) "Guardian ad litem" means an attorney appointed to represent the needs and
best interests of the respondent.
Section 3. KRS 387.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The District Courts shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all proceedings involving
a determination of partial disability or disability, the modification of orders, the
appointment and removal of guardians and conservators, and the management and
settlement of their accounts.
(2) If the respondent or protected person[ward] is a resident of this state, the venue for
Page 4 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
all proceedings under KRS 387.500 to 387.770 shall be:
(a) In the county where the respondent or protected person[ward] resides;
(b) In the county of domicile of the respondent or protected person;[ward; or]
(c) In the county where the parent of the respondent or protected person[ward] is
domiciled if the respondent or protected person[ward] is a minor; or
(d) In the county where a curatorship has been established for the respondent
or protected person.
Nothing in this section shall preclude transfer of venue for good cause shown.
(3) If no local conservator has been appointed and no petition in a disability proceeding
is pending in this state, a domiciliary foreign conservator may file with a court in
this state in a county in which property belonging to the disabled person is located,
authenticated copies of his or her appointment and of any official bond he or she
has given. Thereafter, he or she may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of
a local conservator and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject
to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.
(4) This section shall be subordinate to KRS 387.810 to 387.854 to the extent that those
sections govern jurisdiction between Kentucky and other states.
Section 4. KRS 387.530 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A petition for a determination of partial disability or disability and the appointment
of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator may be filed by
any interested person or by an individual needing guardianship or conservatorship.
The petition shall set forth the following:
(a) The name and address of the respondent;
(b) The date of birth of the respondent, if known;
(c) The nature and degree of the alleged disability of the respondent;
(d) The facts and reasons supporting the need for guardianship or
conservatorship;
Page 5 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(e) A description and approximation of the value of the respondent's financial
resources, including government benefits, insurance entitlements, and
anticipated yearly income, if known;
(f) The names and addresses of the respondent's next of kin, including but not
limited to the respondent's spouse, children, grandchildren, or parents, if
known;
(g) The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of
the respondent;
(h) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;
(i) The name and address of the petitioner's attorney, if any;[ and]
(j) The name and address of any person or entity appointed by the respondent as
respondent's agent[attorney in fact] under a durable power of attorney or as
respondent's surrogate to make health care decisions under an advance
directive; and
(k) The name and address of any person or entity appointed curator of the
respondent under KRS 387.320.
(2) The petition shall be accompanied by a verified application of the person or entity
desiring appointment as limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
conservator. The application shall state the name, address, and qualifications of the
applicant and his or her relationship to the respondent. If it is proposed that a
standby limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator be
designated, the petition shall also be accompanied by the application of the person
or entity desiring to be so designated. Additional petitions may be filed prior to the
date of the hearing by other persons desiring appointment.
Section 5. KRS 387.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Prior to a hearing on a petition for a determination of partial disability or
disability and the appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
Page 6 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
conservator, or conservator, an interdisciplinary evaluation report shall be
filed with the court. The report may be filed as a single and joint report of the
interdisciplinary evaluation team, or it may otherwise be constituted by the
separate reports filed by each individual of the team.
(b) If the court and all parties to the proceeding and their attorneys agree to the
admissibility of the report or reports, the report or reports shall be admitted
into evidence and shall be considered by the court or the jury if one is
impaneled.
(c) The report shall be compiled by at least three (3) individuals, chosen and
appointed by the court, including:
1. A physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a physician
assistant;
2. A psychologist licensed or certified under the provisions of KRS
Chapter 319; and
3. A person licensed or certified as a social worker or an employee of the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services who has at least one (1) year of
investigative experience and has completed training in conducting
decisional capacity assessments. The social worker shall, when possible,
be chosen from among employees of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services residing or working in the area, and there shall be no additional
compensation for their service on the interdisciplinary evaluation team.
(2) At least one (1) person participating in the compilation of the report shall have
knowledge of the particular disability which the respondent is alleged to have or
knowledge of the skills required of the respondent to care for himself or herself and
his or her estate.
(3) If the respondent is alleged to be partially disabled or disabled due to mental illness,
at least one (1) person participating in the compilation of the interdisciplinary
Page 7 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
evaluation report shall be a qualified mental health professional as defined in KRS
202A.011(13). If the respondent is alleged to be partially disabled or disabled due
to an intellectual disability, at least one (1) person participating in the compilation
of the evaluation report shall be a qualified professional in the area of intellectual
disabilities as defined in KRS 202B.010(12).
(4) The interdisciplinary evaluation report shall contain:
(a) A description of the nature and extent of the respondent's disabilities, if any;
(b) Current evaluations of the respondent's social, intellectual, physical, and
educational condition, adaptive behavior, and social skills. Such evaluations
may be based on prior evaluations not more than three (3) months old, except
that evaluations of the respondent's intellectual condition may be based on
individual intelligence test scores not more than one (1) year old;
(c) An opinion as to whether guardianship or conservatorship is needed, the type
of guardianship or conservatorship needed, if any, and the reasons therefor;
(d) An opinion as to the length of time guardianship or conservatorship will be
needed by the respondent, if at all, and the reasons therefor;
(e) If limited guardianship or conservatorship is recommended, a further
recommendation as to the scope of the guardianship or conservatorship,
specifying particularly the rights to be limited and the corresponding powers
and duties of the limited guardian or limited conservator;
(f) A description of the social, educational, medical, and rehabilitative services
currently being utilized by the respondent, if any;
(g) A determination as to whether alternatives to guardianship or conservatorship
are available;
(h) A recommendation as to the most appropriate treatment or rehabilitation plan
and living arrangement for the respondent and the reasons therefor;
(i) A listing of all medications the respondent is receiving, the dosage, and a
Page 8 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
description of the impact of the medication upon the respondent's mental and
physical condition and behavior;
(j) An opinion as to whether attending a hearing on a petition filed under KRS
387.530 would subject the respondent to serious risk of harm;
(k) The names and addresses of all individuals who examined or interviewed the
respondent or otherwise participated in the evaluation; and
(l) Any dissenting opinions or other comments by the evaluators.
(5) The evaluation report may be compiled by a community center for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability, a licensed facility for mentally ill or
developmentally disabled persons, if the respondent is a resident of such facility, or
a similar agency.
(6) In all cases where the respondent is a resident of a licensed facility for mentally ill
or developmentally disabled persons and the petition is filed by an employee of that
facility, the petition shall be accompanied by an interdisciplinary evaluation report
prepared by the facility.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the court shall order
appropriate evaluations to be performed by qualified persons or a qualified agency.
The report shall be prepared and filed with the court and copies mailed to the
attorneys for both parties at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing. All items
specified in subsection (4) of this section shall be included in the report.
(8) If the person evaluated is a poor person as defined in KRS 453.190, the examiners
shall be paid by the county in which the petition is filed upon an order of allowance
entered by the court. Payment shall be in an amount which is reasonable as
determined by the court, except no payment shall be required of the county for an
evaluation performed by a salaried employee of a state agency for an evaluation
performed within the course of his or her employment. Additionally, no payment
shall be required of the county for an evaluation performed by a salaried employee
Page 9 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
of a community center for mental health or individuals with an intellectual
disability or private facility or agency where the costs incurred by the center,
facility, or agency are reimbursable through third-party payors. Affidavits or other
competent evidence shall be admissible to prove the services rendered but not to
prove their value.
(9) The respondent may file a response to the evaluation report no later than five (5)
days prior to the hearing.
(10) The respondent may secure an independent evaluation. If the respondent is unable
to pay for the evaluation, compensation for the independent evaluation may be paid
by the county in an amount which is reasonable as determined by the court.
Section 6. KRS 387.550 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [If the petition is accompanied by an interdisciplinary evaluation report when filed,
the court shall fix a date and a place for a hearing to be held within thirty (30) days
after the filing of the petition. If no interdisciplinary evaluation report accompanies
the petition when filed, ]The court shall endeavor to hear the petition expediently,
but in all cases shall fix a date and a place for a hearing to be held within sixty (60)
days after the filing of the petition. The time for a hearing may be extended by the
court, on motion of either party, for cause.
(2) Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by the clerk of the court
not less than fourteen (14) days prior to the hearing to the attorneys for both parties,
all persons named in the petition, and the person proposed for appointment as
limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator.
Section 7. KRS 387.560 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The respondent shall be represented by counsel. If private counsel has not
entered an appearance on behalf of the respondent within ten (10) days[Unless an
appearance has been entered on behalf of the respondent, the court shall appoint
counsel for the respondent within one (1) week] of the filing of a petition for
Page 10 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
determination of disability under KRS 387.500 to 387.770, the court shall appoint
an attorney to represent the respondent, who shall serve as the attorney for the
respondent and not as a guardian ad litem.
(2) Appointed counsel shall be entitled to compensation for services. If counsel is
appointed for a poor person as defined in KRS 453.190, the court shall prescribe
reasonable compensation to be paid by the county in which the proceeding is held
in accordance with the complexity of the issues, the time involved, and other
relevant considerations, except that appointed counsel shall not be compensated at a
rate higher than one hundred fifty dollars ($150)[sixty dollars ($60)] an hour for
time spent in court and no higher than one hundred dollars ($100)[forty dollars
($40)] an hour for time spent out of court. If the petition is found to be frivolous or
not brought in good faith, counsel fees shall be charged to the petitioner.
(3) Appointed counsel's representation shall terminate upon:
(a) The retention of private counsel;
(b) Appointment of a guardian, conservator, limited guardian, or limited
conservator; or
(c) Dismissal of the petition.
(4) (a)[(3)] In all proceedings under KRS 387.500 to 387.770, it shall be the duty of
the county attorney to assist the petitioner, to represent the interest of the
Commonwealth, and to assist the court in its inquiry by the presentation of
evidence.
(b) The Commonwealth shall present an opening statement, call witnesses, and
make a closing argument to the court, and these duties are not affected by
the presence of private counsel in the proceeding, either representing the
respondent or the petitioner.
Section 8. KRS 387.570 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At a hearing convened pursuant to KRS 387.500 to 387.770 for the purpose of
Page 11 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
determining the disability of a respondent, the respondent shall have the right to
present evidence and to confront and cross-examine all witnesses.
(2) The hearing may be closed to the public on request of the respondent or his or her
counsel.
(3) The respondent shall have the right to be present at the hearing, and his or her
presence may be waived only by his or her failure to appear at the hearing or upon
a determination of the court that his or her attendance would subject him or her to
serious risk of harm. Such determination shall be evidence only of the respondent's
inability to attend the hearing and shall not be considered in determining the need
for guardianship or conservatorship.
(4) The court may remove itself to the place of residence of the respondent to conduct
the hearing in the presence of the respondent.
(5) The burden of proof and burden of presentation of evidence:
(a) Shall be on the Commonwealth to prove the disability or partial disability of
the respondent by clear and convincing evidence; and
(b) Are not affected in any way if the respondent is represented by private
counsel or if private counsel has entered an appearance representing the
petitioner in the proceeding.
(6) The respondent will not be determined partially disabled or disabled unless at least
one (1) of the persons who participated in the interdisciplinary evaluation required
by KRS 387.540 testifies in person at the hearing. This section shall not be
interpreted to preclude the respondent from requiring the testimony of more than
one (1) person participating in the preparation of the evaluation report.
(7) The hearing shall be a jury trial, unless:
(a) The respondent if present, counsel for the respondent, and the attorney for the
Commonwealth agree to a bench trial;
(b) No objection to a bench trial is made by an interested person or entity; and
Page 12 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(c) The interdisciplinary evaluation report prepared for the proceeding reflects a
unanimous consensus of the persons preparing it that the respondent is
disabled or partially disabled, the court has reviewed the report, and the court
finds no cause to require a jury trial.
Section 9. KRS 387.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At a hearing convened under KRS 387.500 to 387.770 for a determination of partial
disability or disability, the court, or the jury if one is impaneled, shall:
(a) Inquire into the nature and extent of the general intellectual functioning of the
respondent;
(b) Inquire into the respondent's capacity to make informed decisions concerning
his or her personal affairs and financial resources;
(c) Determine whether the respondent is disabled, partially disabled, or has no
disability in relation to the management of his or her financial resources;[
and]
(d) Determine whether the respondent is disabled, partially disabled, or has no
disability in relation to the management of his or her personal affairs; and
(e) Determine whether any less restrictive alternatives such as an existing
power of attorney or court-appointed curator are sufficient to protect the
respondent.
(2) If the respondent is found not to be disabled or partially disabled, the petition shall
be dismissed.
(3) If the respondent is found to be disabled or partially disabled, the court shall, at the
same hearing, without a jury, determine:
(a) The type of guardian, conservator, or guardian and conservator to be
appointed;
(b) The specific legal disabilities to which the respondent is subject, if the
respondent has been determined to be partially disabled;
Page 13 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(c) Whether the respondent retains the right to vote;
(d) If the respondent has been determined to be partially disabled, the court
shall detail in the orders of appointment the specific[The] corresponding
powers and duties of the limited guardian, under Sections 16 and 17 of this
Act, or limited conservator, under Sections 20 and 21 of this Act[if the
respondent has been determined to be partially disabled];
(e) If the respondent has been determined to be partially disabled, the court
shall determine whether or not the respondent shall retain the right to
operate a motor vehicle;
(f)[(e)] The individual or entity to be appointed by the court as limited guardian,
guardian, limited conservator, or conservator;
(g)[(f)] The individual or entity, if any, to be appointed as standby guardian or
conservator; and
(h)[(g)] The duration of the term of guardianship or conservatorship.
Section 10. KRS 387.590 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing his or her personal
affairs, but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his or her financial
resources, a limited guardian shall be appointed.
(b) If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing his or her financial
resources, but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his or her
personal affairs, a limited conservator shall be appointed.
(c) If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing both his or her
personal affairs and financial resources, a limited guardian and a limited
conservator shall be appointed. The limited guardian and the limited
conservator may be the same individual, agency, or corporation.
(2) (a) If the respondent is found disabled in managing his or her personal affairs,
but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his or her financial
Page 14 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
resources, a guardian shall be appointed.
(b) If the respondent is found disabled in managing his or her financial resources,
but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his or her personal affairs, a
conservator shall be appointed.
(c) If the respondent is found disabled in managing both his or her personal
affairs and his or her financial resources, a guardian and a conservator shall
be appointed. The guardian and the conservator may be the same individual,
agency, or corporation.
(3) The order of appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
conservator shall specify:
(a) The type of guardianship, conservatorship, or guardianship and
conservatorship to which the protected person[ward] is subject;
(b) The name and address of the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator,
or conservator;
(c) The name and address of the standby guardian or conservator, if a standby
guardian or conservator is designated;
(d) The specific legal disabilities to which the respondent is subject, if the
respondent has been determined to be partially disabled;
(e) The corresponding powers and duties of the limited guardian or limited
conservator, if the respondent has been determined to be partially disabled;
and
(f) The duration of the term of guardianship or conservatorship.
(4) A limited guardian or limited conservator shall not be appointed for a term greater
than five (5) years and may be appointed for a lesser period. A guardian or
conservator may be appointed for a period of unlimited duration.
(5) The judgment of partial disability or disability and the order of appointment shall be
filed in the District Court. The judgment shall be indexed by the county clerk in the
Page 15 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
book in which notices of actions and encumbrances are indexed. Unless such
judgment is filed and indexed, it shall not constitute notice to any subsequent bona
fide purchaser for value, mortgagee, or encumbrancer.
(6) If the respondent is determined to be disabled or partially disabled but no limited
guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator is appointed at the hearing,
the determination shall have no legal effect.
(7) The rights of which a protected person[ward] is legally deprived upon a
determination of disability in managing his or her personal affairs and financial
resources include but are not limited to the right to:
(a) [The right to ]Dispose of property;[,]
(b) Execute instruments;[,]
(c) Enter into contractual relationships;[,]
(d) Determine his or her living arrangements;[,]
(e) Consent to medical procedures;[, and]
(f) Obtain a motor vehicle operator's license; and
(g) Engage private counsel.
(8) A protected person[ward] shall only be deprived of the right to vote if the court
separately and specifically makes a finding on the record as established in KRS
387.580(3)(c).
(9)[(8)] A partially disabled or disabled person for whom a limited guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator has been appointed retains all legal and civil rights
except those which have by court order been designated as legal disabilities or
which have been specifically granted to the limited guardian, limited conservator,
or conservator. A person who is partially disabled may be subject to some but not
all of the disabilities specified in subsection (7) of this section.
Section 11. KRS 387.600 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court may appoint as limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
Page 16 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
conservator any suitable person or any entity, public or private, capable of
conducting an active guardianship or conservatorship program. The court shall not
ordinarily or customarily appoint the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or any
other person or entity, public or private, that is directly providing services to the
respondent unless no other suitable person or entity is available and willing to be
appointed. Appointment of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be
consistent with the provisions of KRS 210.290.
(2) Prior to the appointment, the court shall make a reasonable effort to question the
respondent concerning his or her preference regarding the person or entity to be
appointed limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator, and any
preference indicated shall be given due consideration. If the respondent has
designated another as his or her[ attorney in fact or] agent by executing a power of
attorney in writing, or has an existing curator, that designation shall be treated as
an indication of the respondent's preference as to the person or entity to be
appointed as his or her limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
conservator, and that preference shall be given due consideration. The court shall
appoint the person or entity best qualified and willing to serve.
Section 12. KRS 387.620 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A partially disabled or disabled person, his or her limited guardian, guardian,
limited conservator, or conservator, or any other interested person may petition the
court for:
(a) Termination or modification of an order of partial disability or disability;
(b) Removal [and/]or replacement of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator; or
(c) Renewal of the appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited
conservator, or conservator.
(2) Petitions pursuant to this section shall set forth:
Page 17 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(a) The name and address of the protected person[ward];
(b) The name and address of the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator,
or conservator;
(c) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;
(d) The names and addresses of the protected person's[ward's] next of kin, if
known;
(e) The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of
the protected person[ward];
(f) The relief requested; and
(g) The facts and reasons supporting the request.
(3) A request under subsection (1) of this section, if made by the protected
person[ward], may be communicated to the court by any means, including[,] but
not limited to[,] oral communication or informal letter. If such a request is
communicated by means other than a petition, the court shall appoint a suitable
person who may, but need not be, an employee of the state, county, or court to
prepare a written petition to be filed with the court within seven (7) days following
the appointment. A protected person may retain private counsel to assist in the
filing of a petition or request under this section. Alternately, upon request to the
court, the protected person is entitled to counsel appointed on his or her behalf to
assist in the filing of the petition and to represent the protected person at
subsequent hearings.
(4) Within thirty (30) days after the filing of a petition, the court shall conduct a
hearing at which the protected person[ward] shall be entitled to counsel. The time
for a hearing may be extended by the court, on motion of either party, for cause.
Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by the clerk of the court
not less than fourteen (14) days prior to the hearing to both parties and all persons
named in the petition. The petitioner shall, upon his or her motion, be entitled to
Page 18 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
have the motion for termination or modification determined by a jury.
(5) At the request of any party or on its own initiative, the court may order an
interdisciplinary evaluation of the protected person[ward]. The time period in
which the court must review a petition may be extended for an appropriate period of
time if an evaluation is ordered by the court. The interdisciplinary evaluation report
may be filed as a single or joint report of the interdisciplinary evaluation team, or it
may otherwise be constituted by the separate reports filed by each individual of the
team. If the court and all parties to the proceeding and their attorneys agree to the
admissibility of the report or reports, the report or reports shall be admitted into
evidence and shall be considered by the court.
(6) Upon conclusion of a modification hearing without a jury, the court shall enter a
written order setting forth the factual basis for its finding and may do any of the
following:
(a) Dismiss the petition;
(b) Remove the guardian or conservator and dissolve the guardianship or
conservatorship order;
(c) Remove the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator
and appoint a successor;
(d) Modify the original guardianship or conservatorship order; or
(e) Make any other order which the court deems appropriate and in the best
interest of the protected person[ward].
(7) If the original order is dissolved and no further order is issued, the protected
person[ward] shall be relieved of all legal disabilities. The court shall enter an order
and judgment restoring to the person all of the rights and privileges of a citizen. The
clerk shall note the judgment or modification in the book in which notices of
actions and encumbrances are indexed.
(8) The clerk of the court shall transmit a certified copy of the restoration judgment or
Page 19 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
modification to the originating court, if the judgment or modification is ordered by
a court other than the court in which the original judgment was entered.
Section 13. KRS 387.740 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The court may exercise the powers of a limited guardian or limited conservator or
may appoint an individual or agency to exercise such powers before or during the
pendency of a proceeding for a determination of partial disability or disability or an
appeal therefrom, if it appears that there is danger of serious impairment to the
health or safety of the respondent or damage or dissipation to his or her property if
immediate action is not taken.
(2) Prior to a hearing on the need for an emergency appointment of a limited guardian
or limited conservator, a petition shall be filed by any person or entity which sets
forth the following:
(a) The name, age, and address of the respondent;
(b) The danger alleged to be imminent;
(c) The type of appointment and the protection and assistance requested;
(d) The facts and reasons supporting the request;
(e) The name, address, and qualifications of the proposed limited guardian or
limited conservator, if any;
(f) The name, address, and interest of the petitioner;
(g) The names and addresses of the respondent's next of kin, including but not
limited to spouse, children, grandchildren, or parents, if known;
(h) The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of
the respondent;[ and]
(i) The name and address of the petitioner's attorney, if any;
(j) The name and address of any person or entity appointed by the respondent
as respondent's agent under a durable power of attorney or as respondent's
health care surrogate under an advanced directive;
Page 20 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(k) The name and address of any person or entity appointed curator of the
respondent under KRS 387.320, if known; and
(l)[(i)] The date of filing of the petition for determination of disability or partial
disability.
(3) (a) The court shall review any and all petitions for an emergency appointment of
a limited guardian or limited conservator without delay and not more than one
(1) week after the petition is filed. The circuit clerk in the county in which the
petition is filed shall accept all petitions and the Commonwealth shall not
exclude any petition filed under this section from presentation to the court.
Within one (1) week of the filing of a petition pursuant to this section, the
court shall conduct a hearing at which the respondent shall be entitled to
counsel. Court-appointed counsel shall be withdrawn immediately if the
respondent hires private counsel who enters an appearance on his or her
behalf.
(b) Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given not less than forty-
eight (48) hours prior to the hearing to all persons named in the petition, the
attorney for the respondent, the petitioner, and the Commonwealth unless
waived in writing or on the record.
(4) The Commonwealth shall present evidence at the hearing. The petitioner shall have
the right to present evidence in support of the petition at the hearing in addition to
any evidence presented by the Commonwealth, and shall have the right to cross-
examine witnesses.
(5) The burden shall be on the Commonwealth and the petitioner to prove by clear and
convincing evidence the need for the emergency appointment of a limited guardian
or conservator. The retention of private counsel by the petitioner or the
respondent does not change the burden of the Commonwealth.
(6) If the court exercises the powers of a limited guardian or limited conservator or
Page 21 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
appoints another to do so in an emergency situation as set forth in subsection (1) of
this section, the court shall state on the record findings of fact as to the danger
determined to be imminent, the sources relied on in arriving at such determination,
the type of assistance to be provided, and the powers and duties of the emergency
guardian or conservator. The authority of the guardian or conservator shall expire
upon resolution of the appeal or action.
(7) The appointment of an emergency guardian or conservator does not prohibit the
respondent from retaining counsel to represent him or her in the disability trial.
(8) The authority of the emergency guardian or conservator:
(a) Shall expire upon resolution of the disability proceeding or after sixty (60)
days, whichever occurs sooner unless the court grants an extension;
(b) May extend for one (1) additional sixty (60) day term upon request of the
emergency guardian or conservator, provided the court determines the
emergency situation has not yet been resolved or is likely to continue until
the hearing for determination of the respondent's disability; and
(c) Shall expire no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after appointment.
(9) The emergency guardian or conservator shall file a report within fourteen (14)
days of appointment describing what actions he or she has taken to resolve the
emergency situation.
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 387.500 TO 387.770 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) After the appointment of a guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or limited
guardian, the court may, upon request of the protected person's spouse or other
interested party, address the needs of the marital parties, including but not limited
to:
(a) Division of tangible personal property;
(b) Division of bank accounts, investment assets, and other financial holdings;
Page 22 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
and
(c) A spousal allowance to provide for the support of either the protected
person or his or her spouse.
(2) In making a determination under this section, the court shall consider:
(a) The respective care needs of the parties;
(b) The care available to each of the parties, including means-tested benefits;
(c) The incomes of the parties;
(d) The length of the marriage; and
(e) Support for any minor or disabled children.
(3) If a protected person or his or her spouse is applying for means-tested benefits,
including Medicaid for long-term care, the court may review and approve any
plan for the preservation of assets, including but not limited to:
(a) Funding trusts for the protected person or his or her spouse or disabled
child;
(b) Gifting;
(c) Purchase of assets;
(d) Purchase of a Medicaid-compliant annuity;
(e) Structure of a Medicaid-compliant promissory note; or
(f) Other appropriate planning mechanisms.
SECTION 15. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 387.500 TO 387.770 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The court may at any time appoint a guardian ad litem for the respondent if the
court determines that his or her interests would not otherwise be adequately
represented.
(2) The guardian ad litem shall not be the same individual as the attorney
representing the respondent.
(3) The court shall state the reasons for the appointment.
Page 23 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(4) Any attorney serving as a guardian ad litem shall be entitled to compensation in
the same manner in which an attorney for the respondent is compensated under
subsection (2) of Section 7 of this Act.
Section 16. KRS 387.640 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be the general duty of the limited guardian or guardian to carry out diligently and
in good faith the specific duties and powers assigned by the court and to:
(1) Ensure[Assure] that the personal, civil, and human rights of the protected
person[ward] are protected; and
(2) Encourage the protected person[ward] to:
(a) Participate to the maximum extent of his or her abilities in all decisions which
affect him or her;
(b) Act in his or her own behalf on all matters in which he or she is able to do so;
and
(c) Develop or regain, to the maximum extent possible, his or her capacity to
meet the essential requirements for his or her physical health or safety, and, if
impaired, his or her capacity to manage his or her financial resources.
Section 17. KRS 387.650 is amended to read as follows:
The court may assign to a limited guardian any portion of the powers and duties specified
in KRS 387.660. The court may assign other duties as are necessary to enhance the
protected person's[ward's] safety and well being. A limited guardian shall comply with
the reporting requirements specified by KRS 387.670 which pertain to his or her powers
and duties as specified by the court, provided that all reports submitted shall include the
information required by paragraphs (d) and (f) of KRS 387.670(1).
Section 18. KRS 387.660 is amended to read as follows:
A guardian of a disabled person shall have the following powers and duties, except as
modified by order of the court:
(1) To establish the protected person's[ward's] place of abode within the state, except
Page 24 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
that, if at any time a guardian places a protected person[ward] in a licensed
residential facility for developmentally disabled persons, the guardian shall, within
thirty (30) days of such placement, file with the court notice of the placement,
stating with specificity the reasons for such placement, and an interdisciplinary
evaluation report detailing the social, psychological, medical or other
considerations on which such placement is predicated, a description of the treatment
or habilitation programs which will benefit the protected person[ward] as a result of
such placement, and a determination that such placement will provide appropriate
treatment in the least restrictive available treatment and residential program. For
purposes of this subsection, the interdisciplinary evaluation report may be one
performed within two (2) months prior to the placement for purposes of
determining whether such placement is necessary and appropriate, or may be an
evaluation and assessment provided by the residential facility immediately after
placement. Notice to the court shall not be required where the protected
person[ward] is transferred from one licensed residential facility to another;
(2) To make provision for the protected person's[ward's] care, comfort, and
maintenance and arrange for such educational, social, vocational, and rehabilitation
services as are appropriate and as will assist the protected person[ward] in the
development of maximum self-reliance and independence;
(3) To give any necessary consent or approval to enable the protected person[ward] to
receive medical or other professional care, counsel, treatment or service, except that
a guardian may not consent on behalf of a protected person[ward] to an abortion,
sterilization, psychosurgery, removal of a bodily organ, or amputation of a limb
unless the procedure is first approved by order of the court or is necessary, in an
emergency situation, to preserve the life or prevent serious impairment of the
physical health of the protected person[ward];
(4) To act with respect to the protected person[ward] in a manner which limits the
Page 25 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
deprivation of civil rights and restricts his or her personal freedom only to the
extent necessary to provide needed care and services to him or her; and
(5) To expend sums from the financial resources of the protected person[ward]
reasonable and necessary to carry out the powers and duties assigned to him or her
by the court.
If a separate limited conservator or conservator has been appointed for the protected
person[ward], the expenditure of funds by the limited guardian shall be consistent with
the duties assigned to and procedures and policies established by such limited conservator
or conservator. Conflicts arising between a limited guardian and a limited conservator or
conservator regarding the expenditure of funds which are unable to be otherwise resolved
shall be submitted to the court for resolution.
Section 19. KRS 387.670 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A guardian shall file with the court at least annually a verified report stating:
(a) The protected person's[ward's] current mental, physical, and social condition;
(b) The address of every residence of the protected person[ward] during the
reporting period and length of stay at each residence;
(c) A summary of the medical, social, educational, vocational, and other
professional services received by the protected person[ward] during the
reporting period;
(d) An outline of the guardian's visits with and activities on behalf of the
protected person[ward];
(e) A recommendation as to the need for continued guardianship;
(f) A statement signed by the standby guardian, if one has been appointed, that
the standby guardian continues to be willing to serve in the event of the death,
resignation, removal, or incapacity of the guardian; and
(g) Other information requested by the court or useful in the opinion of the
guardian.
Page 26 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(2) For the purpose of filing the report required by subsection (1) of this section, the
guardian shall be given access to records pertaining to the protected person[ward]
held by public or private agencies which contain information necessary for the
guardian to perform his or her duties.
(3) The court shall review the report required in subsection (1) of this section and take
whatever action it considers necessary to enhance the well-being of the protected
person[ward].
Section 20. KRS 387.680 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be the general duty of the limited conservator or conservator to carry out,
diligently and in good faith, the specific duties and powers assigned by the court and to:
(1) Manage or assist in managing those financial resources placed under his or her
supervision [and/]or control as would a prudent person managing his or her own
resources, including establishing or placing resources in a trust, and, if a
conservator has special skills or is named conservator on the basis of
representations of special skills or expertise, he or she shall use those skills; and
(2) Encourage the protected person[ward] to:
(a) Participate, to the maximum extent of his or her abilities, in all decisions
which affect him or her;
(b) Act on his or her own behalf on all matters in which he or she is able to do
so; and
(c) Develop or regain, to the maximum extent possible, his or her capacity to
manage his or her financial resources and, if impaired, his or her capacity to
meet the essential requirements for his or her physical health or safety.
Section 21. KRS 387.690 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited conservator or conservator shall expend or distribute, or authorize the
expenditure or distribution of, or assist in the expenditure or distribution of, the
principal or income from the financial resources placed under his or her supervision
Page 27 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
and control to ensure[assure] that:
(a) The essential requirements for the physical health or safety of the protected
person[ward] are met;
(b) The rights of the protected person[ward] are protected;
(c) The financial resources of the protected person[ward] which are subject to the
conservatorship are prudently managed;
(d) The protected person[ward] has the opportunity to develop or regain the
capacity to perform the functions listed in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of
subsection (2) of KRS 387.680; and
(e) The limited guardian or guardian for the protected person[ward], if any, is
able to carry out the duties and powers assigned to him or her by the court.
(2) In performing his or her duties, the limited conservator or conservator shall
consider:
(a) The size of the financial resources under the limited conservator's or
conservator's supervision or control;
(b) The probable duration of the conservatorship;
(c) The likelihood that the protected person[ward] may be able to manage his or
her financial resources in the future;
(d) The accustomed standard of living of the protected person[ward];
(e) Other funds or resources used for the support of the protected person[ward]
which have not been placed under the control or supervision of the limited
conservator or conservator; and
(f) The requests of the protected person[ward] and the protected
person's[ward's] limited guardian or guardian, if any.
(3) In addition to the duties and powers listed in subsection (1) of this section, the court
may assign to a limited conservator any of the duties and powers listed in KRS
387.700 which the partially disabled person lacks the ability to perform.
Page 28 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
Section 22. KRS 387.700 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A conservator has all of the powers conferred herein and any additional powers
conferred by law on trustees in this state. The conservator may take possession of
the protected person's[ward's] real and personal property, and of all rents, incomes,
and benefits therefrom, whether accruing before or after his or her appointment,
and of the proceeds arising from the sale, mortgage, lease or exchange thereof.
Subject to such possession the title of all such estate and to the increment and
proceeds thereof shall be to the protected person[ward] and not to the conservator.
It is the duty of the conservator to protect and preserve the estate, to retain, sell and
invest it as hereinafter provided, prosecute or defend actions, claims or proceedings
in any jurisdiction for the protection of the estate's assets, to account for it
faithfully, to perform all other duties required of him or her by law, and, at the
termination of the conservatorship, to deliver the assets of the protected
person[ward] to the persons lawfully entitled thereto.
(2) The conservator shall apply the money and property for the payments of debts,
taxes, claims, charges and expenses of the conservatorship and for the support, care,
maintenance and education of the protected person[ward] or his or her dependents.
(3) Any sale of realty of a protected person[ward] shall be as provided in KRS Chapter
389A.
(4) Any lease of mineral rights, oil and gas rights, or sale of timber owned by a
protected person[ward], or consolidation agreement, as defined by KRS 353.220, to
be made on behalf of a protected person[ward] by a conservator shall require the
authorization and order of the District Court of the county where the conservator
has qualified. Such order may be given only pursuant to written motion which
contains the grounds for the motion and a description of the lease or agreement
involved.
Section 23. KRS 387.710 is amended to read as follows:
Page 29 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(1) Within sixty (60) days of appointment, the limited conservator or conservator shall
file with the court a verified inventory of all the property of the protected person
[ward] which has come to his or her possession or knowledge, including a
statement of all encumbrances, liens, and other secured claims on any item, any
claims against the estate of the protected person[ward], and any cause of action
accruing to the protected person[ward]. The limited conservator or conservator
shall provide a copy thereof to the protected person[ward] if he or she has
sufficient mental capacity to understand it.
(2) (a) A limited conservator or conservator shall file with the court a verified report
and financial account biennially within one hundred twenty (120) days after
the anniversary date of his or her appointment. The report shall contain:
1. The present personal status of the protected person[ward] whose estate
is managed by the conservator;
2. The conservator's plan for preserving and maintaining the estate of
which he or she has control or supervision;
3. The need for continuation or cessation of the conservatorship; and
4. The need for any alteration in the powers of the conservatorship.
(b) The biennial report shall specify the amount and type of real and personal
property received by the conservator and remaining in his or her control or
invested by him or her, the nature of such investment, and expenditures made
during the preceding year. Upon request of the court, the conservator shall
produce for examination any information or documentation which the court
may consider relevant to the accounting of the financial and property
transactions of the estate.
(c) If the protected person[ward] has no real property and possesses personal
property of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less for any year
during the biennial report, the conservator or limited conservator may file an
Page 30 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
informal biennial financial report attesting to the identity of the protected
person's[ward's] financial account and its current balance. If the balance does
not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for any year of the
biennial report, the conservator or limited conservator shall not be required to
render to the court a detailed accounting of the expenditures from the fund,
unless the court, on its own motion or that of any interested party or
individual, deems it necessary to order the conservator or limited conservator
to provide a detailed biennial accounting, including the listing of all
expenditures for that reporting period.
(3) Upon the resignation, removal, or death of a limited conservator or conservator, or
on the termination of the conservatorship, the limited conservator or conservator, or
his or her personal representative, shall [forthwith ]submit a final report and
account to the court and to the former protected person[ward] and to the successor
limited conservator or conservator, or, if the protected person[ward] is deceased, to
his or her personal representative, and shall pay over the trust estate to the person
entitled thereto. Upon approval of the report and account, the limited conservator or
conservator shall be discharged and his or her surety, if any, released.
Section 24. KRS 387.750 is amended to read as follows:
(1) On appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or
conservator, or at any time thereafter, the court may designate another suitable
person or entity to assume the powers and duties assigned to the limited guardian,
guardian, limited conservator, or conservator upon his or her death, resignation,
removal, or incapacity. Prior to such designation, the individual or entity to be
designated shall file with the court a written application stating the name, address,
and qualifications of the applicant and his or her relationship, if any, to the
respondent.
(2) The individual so designated shall file an acceptance with the court within ten (10)
Page 31 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
days of the death, resignation, or incapacity of his or her predecessor. Notice shall
also be given to the protected person[ward] and his or her nearest adult relative.
An individual serving on a standby basis may exercise all the powers and duties
assigned to his or her predecessor upon filing of his or her acceptance unless
otherwise ordered by the court.
(3) In an emergency situation and in the absence and unavailability of the initially
appointed guardian or conservator, the standby guardian or conservator may
temporarily assume the powers and duties of the initially appointed guardian or
conservator.
Section 25. KRS 387.760 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No court costs shall be charged to a respondent or protected person[ward] in any
proceeding under KRS 387.500 to 387.770, if the respondent or protected
person[ward] is a poor person as defined in KRS 453.190.
(2) Limited guardians, guardians, limited conservators, and conservators are entitled to
reasonable compensation for services rendered and to reimbursement for reasonable
and necessary expenses incurred in the exercise of their assigned guardianship or
conservatorship duties and powers. Such compensation and reimbursement shall be
paid from the financial resources of the protected person[ward] and shall not
exceed:
(a) A commission of not more than six percent (6%) of the income collected by
the fiduciary, payable at the time the income is collected; and
(b) Either, but not both, of the following, as elected by the fiduciary:
1. An annual commission of three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) of the fair
market value of the real and personal property in the care of the
fiduciary; or
2. An annual commission of not more than six percent (6%) of the fair
market value of the principal distributed by the fiduciary, payable at the
Page 32 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
time the principal is distributed.
In the absence of an agreement to the contrary, a commission on income shall be
paid out of the income of the estate and a commission on principal shall be paid out
of the principal of the estate.
(3) Upon submitted proof showing that in the handling of the estate the fiduciary has
performed additional and necessary services which have been unusual or
extraordinary and not normally incident to the care and management of a similar
estate, the court may allow the fiduciary additional compensation as is fair and
reasonable for the additional services rendered.
Section 26. KRS 216B.303 is amended to read as follows:
Every resident in a boarding home, as defined in KRS 216B.300, shall have at least the
following rights:
(1) Before entering a boarding home, the resident or the resident's guardian, if any,
shall be fully informed in writing, as evidenced by the resident's written
acknowledgment or that of the resident's guardian, of all services provided by the
boarding home and all applicable charges.
(2) Before entering a boarding home, the resident or the resident's guardian shall be
fully informed in writing, as evidenced by the resident's written acknowledgment or
that of the resident's guardian, of all the resident's rights as defined in this section,
and a list of any rules established by the boarding home.
(3) All residents shall be allowed to exercise their rights as a resident and a citizen, and
may voice grievances and recommend changes in policies and services to the
boarding home operator and to outside representatives of their choice, free from
restraint, interference, coercion, discrimination, or reprisal.
(4) All residents shall be free from mental and physical abuse.
(5) Each resident may manage the use of his or her personal funds. The boarding home
operator shall not require a resident to designate the operator as payee for any
Page 33 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
benefits received by the resident. However, if the operator accepts the responsibility
for managing the resident's personal funds as evidenced by the operator's written
acknowledgment, proper accounting and monitoring of such funds shall be made.
This shall include the operator giving quarterly itemized statements to the resident
or the resident's guardian which detail the status of the resident's personal funds and
any transactions in which such funds have been received or disbursed. The operator
shall return to the resident his or her valuables, personal possessions, and any
unused balance of moneys from his or her account at the time the resident leaves
the boarding home.
(6) Residents shall not be required to perform services for the boarding home.
(7) Residents may associate and communicate privately with persons of their choice,
within reasonable hours established by the boarding home, and send and receive
personal mail unopened.
(8) No resident shall be detained against the resident's will. Residents shall be
permitted and encouraged to go outdoors and leave the premises as they wish.
(9) Residents shall be permitted to participate in activities of social, religious, and
community groups at their discretion.
(10) Residents shall be assured of at least visual privacy in multibed rooms and in
bathrooms.
(11) If the resident has been adjudicated wholly mentally disabled in both financial and
personal affairs in accordance with KRS 387.590, the resident's guardian shall not
place the protected person[ward] in a boarding home.
(12) Each resident shall be treated with consideration, respect, and full recognition of his
or her dignity and individuality.
(13) Residents shall have access to a telephone at a convenient location within the
boarding home for making and receiving telephone calls subject to reasonable rules
established by the boarding home.
Page 34 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1242
(14) Residents have the right to have private meetings with inspectors representing the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(15) Each resident and his or her guardian has the right to have access to all inspection
reports on the boarding home.
Page 35 of 35
XXXX 11/25/2025 9:53 AM Jacketed